Missouri, session 2026, HB2219.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 227, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 227.868, to read as follows:
227.868. The portion of State Highway E from State Highway 79 continuing east
2 to Riverview Drive in Ralls County shall be designated the "James Thompson
3 Highway". The department of transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate
4 signs designating such highway, with the costs to be paid by private donations.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.